sk-SK: Materiál hranola: Akryl; Borosilikátové sklo; Krištáľové sklo; Zmiešané materiály; Optické sklo; Plast (nešpecifikovaný); Polykarbonát (PC); Iné
th: วัสดุปริซึม: อะคริลิก; แก้วบอโรซิลิเกต; แก้วคริสตัล; วัสดุผสม; แก้วออปติคอล; พลาสติก (ไม่ระบุ); โพลิคาร์บอเนต (PC); อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Prisma material: Acrílico; Vidro borossilicato; Cristal; Materiais mistos; Vidro óptico; Plástico (não especificado); Policarbonato (PC); Outro
cs: Materiál hranolu: Akryl; Borosilikátové sklo; Křišťálové sklo; Smíšené materiály; Optické sklo; Plast (nespecifikovaný); Polykarbonát (PC); Ostatní
el: Υλικό πρίσματος: Ακρυλικό; Βοριοπυριτικό γυαλί; Κρυσταλλικό γυαλί; Μεικτά υλικά; Οπτικό γυαλί; Πλαστικό (μη καθορισμένο); Πολυανθρακικό (PC); Άλλο
nb: Prismemateriale: Akryl; Borosilikatglass; Krystallglass; Blandede materialer; Optisk glass; Plast (uspesifisert); Polykarbonat (PC); Annet
zh-CN: 棱镜材质: 亚克力; 硼硅酸盐玻璃; 水晶玻璃; 混合材料; 光学玻璃; 塑料（未指定）; 聚碳酸酯 (PC); 其他
vi: Vật liệu lăng kính: Acrylic; Kính borosilicate; Kính pha lê; Vật liệu hỗn hợp; Kính quang học; Nhựa (không xác định); Polycarbonate (PC); Khác
pl: Materiał pryzmatu: Akryl; Szkło borokrzemianowe; Szkło kryształowe; Materiały mieszane; Szkło optyczne; Tworzywo sztuczne (nieokreślone); Poliwęglan (PC); Inny
ru: Материал призмы: Акрил; Боросиликатное стекло; Хрустальное стекло; Смешанные материалы; Оптическое стекло; Пластик (не указан); Поликарбонат (PC); Другое
bg-BG: Материал на призмата: Акрил; Боросиликатно стъкло; Кристално стъкло; Смесени материали; Оптично стъкло; Пластмаса (неуточнена); Поликарбонат (PC); Друго
ro-RO: Material prismă: Acrilic; Sticlă borosilicată; Cristal; Materiale mixte; Sticlă optică; Plastic (nespecificat); Policarbonat (PC); Altele
da: Prismemateriale: Akryl; Borosilikatglas; Krystalglas; Blandede materialer; Optisk glas; Plast (uspecificeret); Polykarbonat (PC); Andet
lt-LT: Prizmės medžiaga: Akrilas; Borosilikatinis stiklas; Krištolinis stiklas; Mišrios medžiagos; Optinis stiklas; Plastikas (nenurodyta); Polikarbonatas (PC); Kita
ko: 프리즘 재료: 아크릴; 붕규산 유리; 크리스탈 유리; 혼합 소재; 광학 유리; 플라스틱(미지정); 폴리카보네이트(PC); 기타
pt-PT: Material do prisma: Acrílico; Vidro de borossilicato; Vidro de cristal; Materiais mistos; Vidro ótico; Plástico (não especificado); Policarbonato (PC); Outro
it: Materiale del prisma: Acrilico; Vetro borosilicato; Cristallo; Materiali misti; Vetro ottico; Plastica (non specificato); Policarbonato (PC); Altro
hu: Prizma anyaga: Akril; Boroszilikát üveg; Kristályüveg; Vegyes anyagok; Optikai üveg; Műanyag (nem meghatározott); Polikarbonát (PC); Egyéb
sv: Prismamaterial: Akryl; Borosilikatglas; Kristallglas; Blandade material; Optiskt glas; Plast (ospecificerad); Polykarbonat (PC); Övrigt
en: Prism material: Acrylic; Borosilicate glass; Crystal glass; Mixed materials; Optical glass; Plastic (unspecified); Polycarbonate (PC); Other
fr: Matériau du prisme: Acrylique; Verre borosilicaté; Verre de cristal; Matériaux mixtes; Verre optique; Plastique (non spécifié); Polycarbonate (PC); Autre
zh-TW: 稜鏡材質: 壓克力; 硼矽玻璃; 水晶玻璃; 混合材質; 光學玻璃; 塑膠 (未指定); 聚碳酸酯 (PC); 其他
sl-SI: Material prizme: Akril; Borosilikatno steklo; Kristalno steklo; Mešani materiali; Optično steklo; Plastika (nedoločeno); Polikarbonat (PC); Drugo
de: Material des Prismas: Acryl; Borosilikatglas; Kristallglas; Materialmischung; Optisches Glas; Kunststoff (unspezifiziert); Polycarbonat (PC); Sonstige
ja: プリズム材料: アクリル; ホウケイ酸ガラス; クリスタルガラス; 混合素材; 光学ガラス; プラスチック (未指定); ポリカーボネート (PC); その他
hr-HR: Materijal prizme: Akril; Borosilikatno staklo; Kristalno staklo; Mješoviti materijali; Optičko staklo; Plastika (neodređeno); Polikarbonat (PC); Ostalo
es: Material del prisma: Acrílico; Vidrio de borosilicato; Cristal; Materiales mixtos; Vidrio óptico; Plástico (no especificado); Policarbonato (PC); Otro
fi: Prisman materiaali: Akryyli; Borosilikaattilasi; Kristallilasi; Sekamateriaalit; Optinen lasi; Muovi (ei määritetty); Polykarbonaatti (PC); Muu
tr: Prizma malzemesi: Akrilik; Borosilikat cam; Kristal cam; Karışık malzemeler; Optik cam; Plastik (belirtilmemiş); Polikarbonat (PC); Diğer
nl: Prisma materiaal: Acryl; Borosilicaatglas; Kristalglas; Gemengde materialen; Optisch glas; Plastic (ongespecificeerd); Polycarbonaat (PC); Anders